Nebraska, session 109, LB213.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB213 LB213
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-760.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
79-760.01 (1) The State Board of Education shall adopt measurable
academic content standards for at least the grade levels required for
statewide assessment pursuant to section 79-760.03. The standards shall
cover the subject areas of reading, writing, mathematics, science, and
social studies.
(2)(a) The board shall also adopt measurable academic content
standards for the following as part of the social studies standards:
(i) Financial literacy; and
(ii) Education on the Holocaust and other acts of genocide as
recognized by the Congress of the United States or the United Nations as
of January 1, 2022.
(b) On or before March 1, 2024, the board shall also adopt
measurable academic content standards for computer science and technology
education under the mathematics, science, or career and technical
education standards.
(c)(i) On or before March 1, 2026, the board shall adopt measurable
academic content standards for human embryology under the science
education standards. Such standards shall be integrated into each
school's curriculum no later than the start of the 2026-27 school year
and shall include:
(A) Instruction on human development that accurately portrays the
biological science of human embryology, including the Carnegie Stages of
Human Embryonic Development, in the curriculum of elementary, middle
school, and high school students; and
(B) High-definition visual recordings which are of at least four-
dimensional quality, commonly referred to as 4D. The visual recordings
shall show the development of the brain, heart, sex organs, and other
vital organs throughout fetal development.
(ii) A parent, guardian, or educational decisionmaker as defined in
-2-

LB213 LB213
2025 2025
section 79-530 may opt such parent's, guardian's, or educational
decisionmaker's student out of the instruction provided pursuant to
subdivision (2)(c)(i) of this section.
(3) Academic content standards adopted or recommended pursuant to
this section shall be sufficiently clear and measurable to be used for
testing student performance with respect to mastery of the content
described in the state standards.
(4) The State Board of Education shall develop a plan to review and
update standards for each subject area every seven years. The state board
plan shall include a review of commonly accepted standards adopted by
school districts.
Sec. 2. Original section 79-760.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-3-